Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2685.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6740HV (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2685 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with 3 the requirements of section 279.89 relating to student 4 instructional technology standards in the same manner as a 5 school district. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . v. Be subject to and comply with 9 the requirements of section 279.89 relating to student 10 instructional technology standards in the same manner as a 11 school district. 12 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Student instructional 13 technology standards. 14 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 15 requires: 16 a. âDigital instructionâ means lessons, assignments, 17 assessments, or instructional activities delivered through 18 instructional technology. 19 b. âInstructional technologyâ means a laptop, tablet, 20 computer, smart device, software platform, or other similar 21 device or platform used for student learning. 22 c. âOne-to-one digital device programâ means a program 23 through which a school district provides or assigns a digital 24 device to each student for instructional use. 25 2. a. For students enrolled in grades kindergarten through 26 five, digital instruction shall not exceed sixty minutes per 27 school day. 28 b. The following uses shall not count toward the daily 29 limit: 30 (1) Use required pursuant to an individualized education 31 program or a plan developed pursuant to section 504 of the 32 federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973. 33 (2) Assistive or adaptive technology necessary to provide a 34 student access to instruction. 35 -1- LSB 6740HV (2) 91 mb/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 2685 (3) Teacher-directed demonstrations using a projector, 1 smartboard, or similar display device when students are not 2 individually operating a digital device. 3 (4) State assessments and progress monitoring that requires 4 the use of a one-to-one digital device. 5 (5) Dedicated computer science and technology curriculum. 6 3. a. The board of directors of each school district shall 7 adopt a written technology use policy applicable to grades 8 kindergarten through five. 9 b. The policy shall include all of the following: 10 (1) The districtâs daily digital instruction limits. 11 (2) A list of digital platforms and applications used for 12 instruction. 13 (3) Notice of a parentâs or guardianâs right to request 14 additional reductions in the parentâs or guardianâs childâs 15 digital instruction. 16 (4) A statement that instructional technology shall 17 support, and not supplant, foundational learning. 18 c. The policy shall be published on each elementary schoolâs 19 internet site. 20 4. a. Prior to adopting or renewing a one-to-one digital 21 device program for any grade level, the board of directors of a 22 school district shall complete a technology adoption checklist 23 that documents consideration of all of the following: 24 (1) The instructional purpose of the device. 25 (2) Age appropriateness of the device and associated 26 software. 27 (3) Content-filtering limitations and the districtâs 28 capacity to mitigate those limitations. 29 (4) Whether student data is collected, stored, or shared, 30 and the nature of such data practices. 31 b. The checklist shall be retained by the board and made 32 available to the department of education upon request for audit 33 or compliance purposes. 34 c. Each school district shall make publicly available on the 35 -2- LSB 6740HV (2) 91 mb/jh 2/ 4 H.F. 2685 districtâs internet site a list of one-to-one digital device 1 programs in use, and information regarding opt-out options for 2 parents who decline participation in digital instruction. 3 5. This section shall not apply to students enrolled in an 4 online learning program operating pursuant to section 256.43. 5